Hawaii statutes.
§612-24 Preservation of records. All
records and papers compiled and maintained by the clerk in connection with the
selection and service of jurors shall be preserved by the clerk for four years
after the termination of the prescribed period of service and for any longer
period ordered by the court. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 366, §15]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next